Delaware, session 153, SB177.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF DELAWARE: Section 1. Amend Chapter 84, Title 29 of the Delaware Code by making deletions as shown by strike through and insertions as shown by underline as follows: Â§ 8423. Establishment of Transportation Appeals Board; members; terms; removal; quorum. (a) The Transportation Appeals Board (âBoardâ) is hereby created. The Board is a quasi-judicial review board that is constituted to hear appeals of decisions of the Department. (b) The Board consists of 7 Delaware residents who are appointed by the Governor with the advice and consent of the Senate. The Governor shall appoint 2 members from each county and shall appoint a Chair who may reside in any county and who serves at the Governorâs pleasure. No more than a simple majority of the Board may be of one political party. (c) The Board shall annually elect a Vice-Chair and other officers as it deems necessary from among its members. (d) Each member of the Board is appointed for a term of up to 3 years and may serve no more than 2 consecutive full terms. The Governor may initially appoint a member for a term of less than 3 years to ensure terms expire on a staggered basis. (e) A member of the Board receives no compensation but may be reimbursed for the memberâs actual and necessary expenses incurred in the performance of the memberâs official duties. (f) The Governor may remove a member of the Board for gross inefficiency, misfeasance, nonfeasance, malfeasance, or neglect of duty in office. (1) A member is deemed in neglect of duty in office if the member is absent from 3 consecutive Board meetings without good cause or fails to attend at least 50% of all regular Board meetings in a calendar year. (2) A member who is deemed in neglect of duty is deemed to have resigned. (g) The Governor shall fill any vacancies in Board membership for the remainder of the unexpired term. (h) A member of the Board with a personal or private financial interest in the outcome of an appeal before the Board is disqualified from any consideration of that matter and must inform the Chair, who must note such interest on the record of the hearing. (i) A majority of the members must be present at a Board meeting in order to have a quorum and conduct official business. A vacancy on the Board is not counted for quorum. (j) The Board may issue a subpoena for a witness and compel the witnessâs attendance or compel the production of a document, book, record, paper, or other object that may be necessary or proper for the purpose of deciding an appeal. Testimony taken under subpoena must be given under oath subject to the penalties of perjury and must be reduced to writing. (k) The Board may administer oaths to witnesses and conduct prehearing conferences for the simplification of issues by consent, for the disposal of procedural requests or disputes, or to regulate and expedite the course of a hearing. ( l ) The Board may adopt procedural rules to carry out its functions under Â§Â§ 8423 through 8425 of this title. (m) The Department shall provide reasonable staff support to assist the Board in performing its duties under Â§Â§ 8423 through 8425 of this title. Â§ 8424. Appeals to Transportation Appeals Board. (a) A person whose interest is substantially affected by an action of the Department may appeal to the Transportation Appeals Board within 20 days after receipt of the Departmentâs decision or publication of the decision. The Board shall conduct a public hearing for the appeal in accordance with Chapter 101 of Title 29. Deliberations of the Board may be conducted in executive session. (b) When the Board receives an appeal, the Board shall schedule a hearing within 30 days following the receipt of the appeal. The Board shall conduct a hearing within 180 days following the receipt of the appeal. The Board may verbally announce its decision at the conclusion of the hearing. A written decision must be mailed to the parties by certified mail within 90 days after the completion of the hearing. If the Board fails to conduct the hearing or to issue the written decision as required, the decision of the Department is considered a final decision for the purposes of appeal. (c) The record before the Board on appeal must include the entire record before the Department. Each party to the appeal may appear personally or by counsel at the hearing and may produce any competent evidence on that partyâs behalf. The Board may exclude evidence that is plainly irrelevant, immaterial, insubstantial, cumulative, or unduly repetitive, and may limit unduly repetitive proof, rebuttal, and cross-examination. (d) The burden of proof in an appeal is upon the appellant to show that the Departmentâs decision is not supported by the evidence on the record before the Board. The Board may affirm, reverse, or remand with instructions an appeal of a case decision before the Department. (e) An appeal of a regulation must be on the record before the Department. The Board may hear new evidence if it is relevant to or clarifies an issue in the record before the Department. The Board may exclude new evidence that is plainly irrelevant, immaterial, insubstantial, cumulative, or unduly repetitive. A regulation is presumed valid, and the burden is upon the appellant to show that the regulation is arbitrary and capricious, or adopted without a reasonable basis in the record. The Board shall take due account of the Departmentâs experience and specialized competence and of the purposes of this chapter in making its determination. The Board may affirm, reverse, or remand any appeal of a regulation that the Department promulgates. (f) Each member of the Board who votes must indicate the nature of the memberâs vote in the written decision. (g) There may be no appeal of the Departmentâs decision to deny a permit on a matter involving state-owned land, including subaqueous lands, except for an appeal based on the sole ground that the decision was discriminatory in that the applicant, whose circumstances are like or similar to those of other applicants, was not afforded like or similar treatment. (h) An appeal under this section does not automatically stay an action of the Department, but upon application and for good cause, the Department or the Court of Chancery may stay the action pending disposition of the appeal. (i) After an appeal is filed with the Board, the parties may, by stipulation, proceed directly to Superior Court, in which case the Court may affirm, reverse, or remand the Departmentâs decision based on the record before the Department and the Board and other evidence the parties may submit by stipulation. The standard of review for an appeal is governed by subsections (d) and (e) of this section. (j) If the Board concludes that an immediate or expedited review of a decision of the Department is appropriate or necessary, the Board may hold a public hearing on the appeal at the earliest possible time and issue a decision on the appeal. If the Board concludes that an immediate or expedited review of a decision of the Department is appropriate or necessary, the notice requirements of this section and of Chapter 101 of Title 29 do not apply, and the Board shall give advance notice of the hearing only to the extent reasonably possible. Â§ 8425. Appeals from the Transportation Appeals Boardâs decision. (a) A person or an officer, department, board, or bureau of this State aggrieved by a decision of the Board may appeal to the Superior Court (âCourtâ) in and for the county in which the activity in question is wholly or principally located. An appeal under this section must be made within 30 days of the receipt of the Boardâs written decision. (b) The Court may affirm, reverse, or modify the Boardâs decision. The Court may not set aside the Boardâs finding of fact unless the Court determines that the records contain no substantial evidence that would reasonably support the findings. If the Court finds that additional evidence should be taken, the Court may remand the case to the Board for completion of the record. (c) An appeal under this section does not automatically stay an action of the Department. Upon application and for good cause, the Board or the Court of Chancery may stay the action pending the disposition of the appeal. Section 2. Amend Â§ 10161, Title 29 of the Delaware Code by making deletions as shown by strike through and insertions as shown by underline as follows: Â§ 10161. State agencies affected. (a) This chapter shall apply only to the following agencies: (51) Board of Home Inspectors; and Inspectors; (52) Board of Elevator Mechanics. Mechanics; and (53) Transportation Appeals Board.